test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-26hepemj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hepeḿ: # Noun (25) hepeḿ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Nom: hepeḿ
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Gen: hebeme
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Par: hebend
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ill: hepemehe
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ine: hepemen
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ela: hepemest
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+All: hepemele
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ade: hepemel
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Abl: hepemelt
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Tra: hepemes
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Ter: hepemeniq
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Abe: hepemeldäq
     hepeḿ+N+Sg+Com: hepemegaq
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Nom: hepemeq
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Gen: hepemide
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Par: hepemit
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ill: hepemihe
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ine: hepemin
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ela: hepemist
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+All: hepemile
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ade: hepemil
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Abl: hepemilt
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Tra: hepemis
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Ter: hepeminiq
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Abe: hepemildäq
     hepeḿ+N+Pl+Com: hepemidegaq
